Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.12.110

Record of programming—Devices sealed.

In preparing a voting device for a primary or election, a record shall be made of the programming installed in each device. Except where provided by a rule adopted under RCW 29A.04.611, after being prepared for a primary or election, each device shall be sealed with a uniquely numbered seal. The programmed memory pack for each voting device must be sealed into the device during final preparation and logic and accuracy testing. Except in the case of a device breakdown or error in programming, the memory pack must remain sealed in the device until after 8:00 p.m. on the day of the primary, special election, or general election.

[ 2011 c 10 s 23; 2003 c 111 s 311; 1990 c 59 s 25. Formerly RCW 29.33.330.]

NOTES:

Notice to registered poll voters—Elections by mail—2011 c 10: See note following RCW 29A.04.008.

Intent—Effective date—1990 c 59: See notes following RCW 29A.04.013.